src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON св_1as_а́ть
:а́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON св_1as_я́ть
:я́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON св_1a_е́ть
:е́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_я́ть
св_1a_я́ть? ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_я́ть?
:я́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_я́ть_прич._страд._V/енный
св_1a_я́ть? ;
:е PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_еба́ть
:еба́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:еба́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:еба́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёба PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_ева́ть
:ева́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ева́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ева́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёва PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_ега́ть
:ега́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ега́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ега́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёга PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_едла́ть
:едла́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:едла́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:едла́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёдла PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_ена́ть_PstPss_атый/утый
:ена́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ена́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ена́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёна PastPass_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёну PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_епа́ть
:епа́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:епа́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:епа́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёпа PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_ерка́ть
:ерка́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ерка́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ерка́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёрка PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_ерста́ть
:ерста́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ерста́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ерста́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёрста PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_ерха́ть
:ерха́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ерха́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ерха́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёрха PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_ё_ета́ть
:ета́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:ета́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ета́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёта PastPass_нн_stem ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 1 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON нсв_1a_Lxc
нсв_нп_1a_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_1a_а́ть_Lxc
:а́ св_нп_1a_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св-нсв_1a_а́ть_Lxc
:а́ нсв_1a_Lxc ;
св_1a_а́ть_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_1a_Lxc
св_нп_1a_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_1a_я́ть_Lxc
св_1a_я́ть?_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_1a?_Lxc
нсв_нп_1a_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_1a?_многокр._Lxc                        ! ITERATIVE TODO: do we need to tag these?
нсв_нп_1a_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PresPass_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_1a_Lxc
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_1a_имеется_страд._Lxc
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+IV:е PresPass_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_нп_1a_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_1a_я́ть?_Lxc
:я́ св_нп_1a ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

!====================================== Stem type 2 ======================================
!                                     чувствовать, etc.
! 2A has present passive ppl

LEXICON нсв_2a
нсв_нп_2a ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>уе PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_[но_в_прош._также_св]_2a
нсв_2a ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у Impf_Pres_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у Impf_Pres_1_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_2a
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_2a_имеется_прич._страд._наст.
нсв_нп_2a ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>уе PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_2a_R
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_2a_ова́
нсв_нп_2a_ова́ ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у́е PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_2a_ова́
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_2a_ова́_R
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_2a_ова́_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_[но_в_прош._также_св]_2a_ова́_R
нсв_2a_ова́_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_2a_ё_ова́
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у́е PresPass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ёва PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_2a
св_нп_2a ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>ова Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>у Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>ова PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_2a
+V+Perf+IV:%>ова Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>у Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_2a_R
+V+Perf+IV:%>ова Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>у Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_2a_ова́
св_нп_2a_ова́ ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>о́ва PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_2a_ова́
+V+Perf+IV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_2a_ова́_R
+V+Perf+IV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_[но_в_наст.-буд._также_нсв]_2a_ова́
св_2a_ова́ ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_[но_в_личных_формах_наст.-буд._также_нсв]_2a_ова́
св_2a_ова́ ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_Fac ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_Fac ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:%>у́ PresFut_1_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:%>у́ Imper_unstressed_Fac ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:%>у́%<у PresAct_Fac ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:%>у́ PresVrbAdv_stem_Fac ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:%>у́ PresFut_1_stem ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:%>у́ Imper_unstressed_Fac ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:%>у́%<у PresAct_Fac ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:%>у́ PresVrbAdv_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON св_[но_в_наст.-буд._также_нсв]_2a_ова́_R
св_2a_ова́_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_stem_R_Fac ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_2a_ё_ова́
+V+Perf+TV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>ёва PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св-нсв_2a_ё_ова́
нсв_2a_ё_ова́ ;
св_2a_ё_ова́ ;

LEXICON св-нсв_2a
нсв_2a ;
св_2a ;

LEXICON св-нсв_2a_R
нсв_2a_R ;
св_2a_R ;

LEXICON св-нсв_нп_2a
нсв_нп_2a ;
св_нп_2a ;

LEXICON св-нсв_2a_ова́
нсв_2a_ова́ ;
св_2a_ова́ ;

LEXICON св-нсв_2as_ова́
св-нсв_2a_ова́ ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>о́ва PastPass_нн_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON св-нсв_2a_ова́_R
нсв_2a_ова́_R ;
св_2a_ова́_R ;

LEXICON св-нсв_нп_2a_ова́
нсв_нп_2a_ова́ ;
св_нп_2a_ова́ ;

LEXICON нсв_2b
нсв_нп_2b ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_2b_R
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_2b
+V+Impf+IV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_2b_ё
нсв_нп_2b ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ова́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>у́ Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%>ёва PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_2b
св_нп_2b ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>ова́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>у́ Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:%>о́ва PastPass_нн_stem ;
