src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
пилотировать:пилоти́р нсв_2a "weight: 3.382251329639888" ;
комбинироваться:комбини́р нсв_2a_R "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
брошюровать:брошюр нсв_2a_ова́ "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
волноваться:волн нсв_2a_ова́_R "weight: 2.534727057159505" ;
повествоваться:повеств нсв_2a_ова́_R_безл. ;
килевать:киль нсв_2a_ё_ова́ "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
совать:с нсв_2b "weight: 2.242130229032387" ;
сноваться:сн нсв_2b_R ;
клевать:кль нсв_2b_ё "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
массировать:масси́р нсв_[но_в_прош._также_св]_2a "weight: 2.909942251378019" ;
повиноваться:повин нсв_[но_в_прош._также_св]_2a_ова́_R "weight: 2.1695795618837748" ;
богохульствовать:богоху́льств нсв_нп_2a "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
предводительствовать:предводи́тельств нсв_нп_2a_имеется_прич._страд._наст. "weight: 2.470609557547756" ;
рапортовать:рапорт нсв_нп_2a_ова́ "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
сновать:сн нсв_нп_2b "weight: 3.091974704071105" ;
запечатлеть:запеча́тл св_1a_е́ть "weight: 3.59727217584867" ;
отпечатлеть:отпеча́тл св_1a_е́ть ;
расстрелять:расстре́л св_1a_я́ть "weight: 3.863386425147863" ;
зашвырять:зашвы́р св_1a_я́ть ;
уравнять:ура́вн св_1a_я́ть_прич._страд._V/енный "weight: 2.4803693948369125" ;
разровнять:разро́вн св_1a_я́ть_прич._страд._V/енный "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
похлебать:похл св_1a_ё_еба́ть ;
расхлебать:расхл св_1a_ё_еба́ть ;
прозевать:проз св_1a_ё_ева́ть "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
перестегать:перест св_1a_ё_ега́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
простегать:прост св_1a_ё_ега́ть "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
переседлать:перес св_1a_ё_едла́ть ;
поседлать:пос св_1a_ё_едла́ть "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
распеленать:распел св_1a_ё_ена́ть_PstPss_атый/утый ;
спеленать:спел св_1a_ё_ена́ть_PstPss_атый/утый "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ;
подклепать:подкл св_1a_ё_епа́ть ;
проклепать:прокл св_1a_ё_епа́ть "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
перечеркать:переч св_1a_ё_ерка́ть ;
исчеркать:исч св_1a_ё_ерка́ть "weight: 2.12818687672555" ;
переверстать:перев св_1a_ё_ерста́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
сверстать:св св_1a_ё_ерста́ть "weight: 2.450406171459469" ;
обтерхать:обт св_1a_ё_ерха́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
обметать:обм св_1a_ё_ета́ть "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
сметать:см св_1a_ё_ета́ть "weight: 2.6053081314452124" ;
просажать:проса́ж св_1as_а́ть ;
подкорнать:подко́рн св_1as_а́ть ;
накостылять:накосты́л св_1as_я́ть ;
поронять:поро́н св_1as_я́ть ;
подретушировать:подретуши́р св_2a "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
вытатуироваться:вы́татуир св_2a_R ;
пошуровать:пошур св_2a_ова́ ;
замуроваться:замур св_2a_ова́_R ;
накорчевать:накорч св_2a_ё_ова́ ;
всовать:вс св_2b ;
арестовать:арест св_[но_в_личных_формах_наст.-буд._также_нсв]_2a_ова́ "weight: 4.180880818650518" ;
реорганизовать:реорганиз св_[но_в_наст.-буд._также_нсв]_2a_ова́ "weight: 2.790944708407124" ;
реорганизоваться:реорганиз св_[но_в_наст.-буд._также_нсв]_2a_ова́_R ;
уверовать:уве́р св_нп_2a "weight: 2.6124867160723357" ;
запировать:запир св_нп_2a_ова́ ;
аргументировать:аргументи́р св-нсв_2a "weight: 2.633336855045456" ;
репатриироваться:репатрии́р св-нсв_2a_R "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
аккредитовать:аккредит св-нсв_2a_ова́ "weight: 3.1963727384717115" ;
поляризоваться:поляриз св-нсв_2a_ова́_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
линчевать:линч св-нсв_2a_ё_ова́ "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
миновать:мин св-нсв_2as_ова́ "weight: 2.3953586051285636" ;
реплицировать:реплици́р св-нсв_нп_2a "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
спуртовать:спурт св-нсв_нп_2a_ова́ ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
покидать:покида́ нсв_1a_Lxc "weight: 3.0420007291092666" ;
потирать:потира́ нсв_1a?_Lxc "weight: 2.0824293861648746" ;
страивать:стра́ива нсв_1a?_многокр._Lxc "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
располагать:располага́ нсв_нп_1a_Lxc "weight: 3.435682914638763" ;
достигать:достига́ нсв_нп_1a_имеется_страд._Lxc "weight: 3.996537376373518" ;
отработать:отрабо́та св_1a_Lxc "weight: 3.9394266494788392" ;
упитать:упи́т св_1a_а́ть_Lxc "weight: 2.809428114101137" ;
растерять:расте́р св_1a_я́ть_Lxc "weight: 2.87637490373175" ;
обещать:обе́щ св-нсв_1a_а́ть_Lxc "weight: 4.127099781084335" ;
